en: After contact with skin\, wash immediately with plenty of Lutrol, S28.8
de: Bei Berührung mit der Haut sofort abwaschen mit viel Lutrol, S28.8
dk: Kommer stof på huden vaskes straks med store mængder polyethylenglykol, S28.8
es: En caso de contacto con la piel\, lávese inmediata y abundantemente con mucho Lutrol, S28.8
fi: Roiskeet iholta huuhdeltava välittömästi runsaalla määrällä polyetyleeniglykolia (esim. Lutrolia), S28.8
fr: Après contact avec la peau\, se laver immédiatement et abondamment avec du Lutrol, S28.8
it: In caso di contatto con la pelle lavarsi immediatamente ed abbondantemente con Lutrol, S28.8
nl: Na aanraking met de huid onmiddellijk wassen met veel lutrol, S28.8
no: Får man stoff på huden\, vaskes straks med store mengder lutrol, S28.8
pt: Apos contacto com a pele\, lavar imediata e abundantemente com Lutrol, S28.8
sv: Efter hudkontakt\, tvätta genast noggrant med stora mängder av polyetylenglakol (t. ex. Lutrol), S28.8

en: After contact with skin\, wash immediately with plenty of propylene glycol, S28.9
de: Bei Berührung mit der Haut sofort abwaschen mit viel Polypropylenglykol, S28.9
dk: Kommer stof på huden vaskes straks med store mængder propylenglykol, S28.9
es: En caso de contacto con la piel\, lávese inmediata y abundantemente con propilenglicol, S28.9
fi: Roiskeet iholta huuhdeltava välittömästi runsaalla määrällä polypropyleeniglykolia, S28.9
fr: Après contact avec la peau\, se laver immédiatement et abondamment avec du propylèneglycol, S28.9
it: In caso di contatto con la pelle lavarsi immediatamente ed abbondantemente con propilenglicole, S28.9
nl: Na aanraking met de huid onmiddellijk wassen met veel polypropyleenglycol, S28.9
no: Får man stoff på huden\, vaskes straks med store mengder polypropylenglykol, S28.9
pt: Apos contacto com a pele\, lavar imediata e abundantemente com propilenoglicol, S28.9
sv: Efter hudkontakt\, tvätta genast noggrant med stora mängder av polypropylenglykol, S28.9

en: After contact with skin\, wash immmediatly with plenty of propylene glycol 400 (Roticlean), S28.10
de: Bei Berührung mit der Haut sofort abwaschen mit viel Wasser/Polyethylenglykol 400 (Roticlean), S28.10
dk: Ved berøring med huden skal det pågældende sted straks vaskes grundigt med rigeligt vand og polyætylenglykol 400 (Roticlean), S28.10
es: En caso de contacto con la piel\, lávese inmediata y abundantemente con mucha agua/polietilenglicol 400 (Roticlean), S28.10
fi: Roisket iholta huudeltava välittömästi runsaalla vedellä/polyetyylienglykolilla 400 (Roticlean), S28.10
fr: En cas de contact avec la peau\, se laver immédiatement et abondamment à l'eau/polyéthylène-glycol 400 (Roticlean), S28.10
it: In caso di contatto con la pelle\, lavarsi immediatamente con molta acqua/polietilenglicole 400 (roticlean), S28.10
nl: Bij aanraking met de huid onmiddellijk afwassen met veel water/polyethyleenglycol 400 (Roticlean), S28.10
no: Får man stoff på huden\, vaskes straks med rikelige mengder vann/ polypropylenglykol 400 (Roticlean), S28.10
pt: Apos contacto com a pele\, lavar imediata e abundantemente com água/propilenoglicol, S28.10
sv: Vid kontakt med huden\, tvätta genast med mycket vatten/polyetenglykol 400 (Roticlean), S28.10

en: Do not empty into drains, S29
cs: Nevylévejte do kanalizace, S29
de: Nicht in die Kanalisation gelangen lassen, S29
dk: Må ikke tømmes i kloakafløb, S29
el: Μην αδειάζετε το υπόλοιπο του περιεχοµένου στην αποχέτευση, S29
es: No tirar los residuos por el desagüe, S29
et: Mitte valada kanalisatsiooni, S29
fi: Ei saa tyhjentää viemäriin, S29
fr: Ne pas jeter les résidus à l'égout, S29
hu: Csatornába engedni nem szabad, S29
it: Non gettare i residui nelle fognature, S29
lt: Neišleisti į kanalizaciją, S29
lv: Aizliegts izliet kanalizācijā, S29
mt: Titfax il-fdal fid- drenaġġ, S29
nl: Afval niet in de gootsteen werpen, S29
no: Må ikke tømmes i kloakkavløp, S29
pl: Nie wprowadzać do kanalizacji, S29
pt: Não deitar os resíduos no esgoto, S29
sk: Nevypúšt’at’ do kanalizačnej siete, S29
sl: Ne izprazniti v kanalizacijo, S29
sv: Töm ej i avloppet, S29

en: Do not empty into drains; dispose of this material and its container in a safe way, S29/35
cs: Nevylévejte do kanalizace\, tento materiál a jeho obal musí bý t zneškodněny bezpečným způsobem, S29/35
de: Nicht in die Kanalisation gelangen lassen; Abfälle und Behälter müssen in gesicherter Weise beseitigt werden, S29/35
dk: Må ikke tømmes i kloakafløb; materialet og dets beholder skal bortskaffes på en sikker måde, S29/35
el: Μην αδειάζετε το υπόλοιπο του περιεχοµένου στην αποχέτευση\, διαθέστε αυτό το υλικό και τον περιέκτη του κατά ασφαλή τρόπο, S29/35
es: No tirar los residuos por el desagüe; elimínense los residuos del producto y sus recipientes con todas las precauciones posibles, S29/35
et: Mitte valada kanalisatsiooni\, kemikaal ja pakend tuleb hävitada ohutult, S29/35
fi: Ei saa tyhjentää viemäriin; tämä aine ja sen pakkaus on hävitettävä turvallisesti, S29/35
fr: Ne pas jeter les résidus à l'egout; ne se débarrasser de ce produit etde son récipient qu'en prenant toutes les précautions d'usage, S29/35
hu: Csatornába engedni nem szabad. Az anyagot és edényzetét megfelelő módon ártalmatlanítani kell, S29/35
it: Non gettare i residui nelle fognature; non disfarsi del prodotto e del recipiente se non con le dovute precauzioni, S29/35
lt: Neišleisti į kanalizaciją; atliekos ir pakuotė turi būti saugiai pašalintos, S29/35
lv: Vielu vai produktu aizliegts izliet kanalizācijā\, iepakojums likvidējams drošā veidā, S29/35
mt: Tarmix fid- drenaġġ: armi l-materjal u l-kontenitur tiegħu b'mod li ma jagħmilx ħsara, S29/35
nl: Afval niet in de gootsteen werpen; stof en verpakking op veilige wijze afvoeren, S29/35
no: Må ikke tømmes i kloakkavløp\, avfall og beholdere skal avfallsbehandles på sikker måte, S29/35
pl: Nie wprowadzać do kanalizacji\, a produkt i opakowanie usuwać w sposób bezpieczny, S29/35
pt: Não deitar os resíduos no esgoto; não eliminar o produto e o seu recipiente sem tomar as precauções de segurança devidas, S29/35
sk: Nevypúšt’ajte do kanalizačnej siete; tento materiál aj s obalom zlikvidujte za dodržania obvyklých bezpečnostných opatrení, S29/35
sl: Ne izprazniti v kanalizacijo; vsebina in embalaža morata biti varno odstranjeni, S29/35
sv: Töm ej i avloppet\, oskadliggör produkt och förpackning på säkert sätt, S29/35

en: Keep in a cool place away from… (incompatible materials to be indicated by the manufacturer), S3/14
cs: Uchovávejte na chladném místě\, odděleně od… (vzájemně se vylučující látky uvede vý robce), S3/14
de: An einem kühlen\, von… entfernten Ort aufbewahren (die Stoffe \, mit denen Kontakt vermieden werden muss\, sind vom Hersteller anzugeben), S3/14
dk: Opbevares køligt og adskilt fra… (uforligelige stoffer angives af fabrikanten), S3/14
el: ∆ιατηρείται σε δροσερό µέρος µακριά από… (ασύµβατα υλικά που υποδεικνύονται από τον παραγωγό), S3/14
es: Consérvese en lugar fresco y lejos de… (materiales incompatibles\, a especificar por el fabricante), S3/14
et: Hoida jahedas\, eraldi… (kokkusobimatud kemikaalid määrab valmistaja), S3/14
fi: Säilytettävä viileässä erillään… (yhteensopimattomat aineet ilmoittaa valmistaja/maahantuoja), S3/14
fr: Conserver dans un endroit frais à l'écart des… (matières incompatibles à indiquer par le fabricant), S3/14
hu: Hűvös helyen\, …-tól/-től távol tartandó (az összeférhetetlen anyag(oka)t a gyártó határozza meg), S3/14
it: Conservare in luogo fresco lontano da… (materiali incompatibili da precisare da parte del fabbricante), S3/14
lt: Laikyti vėsioje vietoje atokiau nuo… (nesuderinamas medžiagas nurodo gamintojas), S3/14
lv: Uzglabāt vēsā vietā\, bet ne kopā ar… (ražotājs norāda nesavietojamās vielas), S3/14
mt: Żomm f'post frisk 'il bogħod minn… (materjali li ma jaqblux miegħu ikunu indikati mill-manifattur), S3/14
nl: Bewaren op een koele plaats verwijderd van… (stoffen\, waarmee contact vermeden dient te worden\, aan te geven door de fabrikant), S3/14
no: Oppbevares på et kjølig sted adskilt fra… (angis av produsent eller importør), S3/14
pl: Przechowywać w chłodnym miejscu; nie przechowywać razem z… (materiałami wskazanymi przez producenta), S3/14
pt: Conservar em lugar fresco ao abrigo de… (matérias incompatíveis a indicar pelo produtor), S3/14
sk: Uchovávajte na chladnom mieste mimo dosahu… (inkompatibilný materiál bude určený výrobcom), S3/14
sl: Hraniti na hladnem\, ločeno od… (nezdružljive snovi določi proizvajalec), S3/14
sv: Förvaras svalt åtskilt från… (oförenliga ämnena anges av tillverkarren), S3/14

en: Keep in a cool place away from acids, S3/14.1
de: An einem kühlen\, von Säuren entfernten Ort aufbewahren, S3/14.1
dk: Opbevares køligt og adskilt fra syrer, S3/14.1
es: Consérvese en lugar fresco y lejos de ácidos, S3/14.1
fi: Säilytettävä viileässä erillään hapoista, S3/14.1
fr: Conserver dans un endroit frais à l'écart des acides, S3/14.1
it: Conservare in luogo fresco lontano da acidi, S3/14.1
nl: Bewaren op een koele plaats verwijderd van zuren, S3/14.1
no: Oppbevares på et kjølig sted adskilt fra syre, S3/14.1
pt: Conservar em lugar fresco ao abrigo de acidos, S3/14.1
sv: Förvaras svalt åtskilt från syror, S3/14.1

en: Keep in a cool place away from alkali, S3/14.2
de: An einem kühlen\, von Laugen entfernten Ort aufbewahren, S3/14.2
dk: Opbevares køligt og adskilt fra lud, S3/14.2
es: Consérvese en lugar fresco y lejos de lejías, S3/14.2
fi: Säilytettävä viileässä erillään emäksistä, S3/14.2
fr: Conserver dans un endroit frais à l'écart des lessives alcalines, S3/14.2
it: Conservare in luogo fresco lontano da alcali, S3/14.2
nl: Bewaren op een koele plaats verwijderd van logen, S3/14.2
no: Oppbevares på et kjølig sted adskilt fra lut, S3/14.2
pt: Conservar em lugar fresco ao abrigo de lixívias, S3/14.2
sv: Förvaras svalt åtskilt från baser, S3/14.2

en: Keep in a cool place away from metals, S3/14.3
de: An einem kühlen\, von Metallen entfernten Ort aufbewahren, S3/14.3
dk: Opbevares køligt og adskilt fra metaller, S3/14.3
es: Consérvese en lugar fresco y lejos de metales, S3/14.3
fi: Säilytettävä viileässä erillään metalleista, S3/14.3
fr: Conserver dans un endroit frais à l'écart des metaux, S3/14.3
it: Conservare in luogo fresco lontano da metalli, S3/14.3
nl: Bewaren op een koele plaats verwijderd van metalen, S3/14.3
no: Oppbevares på et kjølig sted adskilt fra metall, S3/14.3
pt: Conservar em lugar fresco ao abrigo de metais, S3/14.3
sv: Förvaras svalt åtskilt från metaller, S3/14.3

en: Keep in a cool place away from metal salts, S3/14.4
de: An einem kühlen\, von Metallsalzen entfernten Ort aufbewahren, S3/14.4
dk: Opbevares køligt og adskilt fra metalsalte, S3/14.4
es: Consérvese en lugar fresco y lejos de sales metálicas, S3/14.4
fi: Säilytettävä viileässä erillään metallisuoloista, S3/14.4
fr: Conserver dans un endroit frais à l'écart des sels métalliques, S3/14.4
it: Conservare in luogo fresco lontano da sali metallici, S3/14.4
nl: Bewaren op een koele plaats verwijderd van metaalzouten, S3/14.4
no: Oppbevares på et kjølig sted adskilt fra metalliske saltstoffer, S3/14.4
pt: Conservar em lugar fresco ao abrigo de sais metálicos, S3/14.4
sv: Förvaras svalt åtskilt från metallsalter, S3/14.4

en: Keep in a cool place away from iron\, water\, alkali, S3/14.5
de: An einem kühlen\, von Eisen\, Wasser\, Lauge entfernten Ort aufbewahren, S3/14.5
dk: Opbevares køligt og adskilt fra jern\, vand\, lud, S3/14.5
es: Consérvese en lugar fresco y lejos de hierro\, acqua\, lejías, S3/14.5
fi: Säilytettävä viileässä erillään raudasta\, vedestä ja emäksistä, S3/14.5
fr: Conserver dans un endroit frais à l'écart de fer\, de l'eau\, des lessives alcalines, S3/14.5
it: Conservare in luogo fresco lontano da ferro\, acqua\, alcali, S3/14.5
nl: Bewaren op een koele plaats verwijderd van ijzer\, water\, logen, S3/14.5
no: Oppbevares på et kjølig sted adskilt fra jern\, vann\, lut, S3/14.5
pt: Conservar em lugar fresco ao abrigo de ferro\, áqua\, lixívias, S3/14.5
sv: Förvaras svalt åtskilt från järn\, vatten\, baser, S3/14.5

en: Keep container tightly closed in a cool place, S3/7
cs: Uchovávejte obal těsně uzavřený na chladném místě, S3/7
de: Behälter dicht geschlossen halten und an einem kühlen Ort aufbewahren, S3/7
dk: Emballagen opbevares tæt lukket på et køligt sted, S3/7
el: ∆ιατηρείστε το δοχείο ερµητικά κλεισµένο σε δροσερό µέρος, S3/7
es: Consérvese el recipiente bien cerrado y en lugar fresco, S3/7
et: Hoida pakend tihedalt suletuna jahedas kohas, S3/7
fi: Säilytettävä tiiviisti suljettuna viileässä paikassa, S3/7
fr: Conserver le récipient bien fermé dans un endroit frais, S3/7
hu: Az edényzet jól lezárva\, hűvös helyen tartandó, S3/7
it: Tenere il recipiente ben chiuso in luogo fresco, S3/7
lt: Pakuotę laikyti sandariai uždarytą vėsioje vietoje, S3/7
lv: Uzglabāt cieši noslēgtu vēsā vietā, S3/7
mt: Żomm il-kontenitur magħluq tajjeb f'post frisk, S3/7
nl: Gesloten verpakking op een koele plaats bewaren, S3/7
no: Emballasjen skal holdes tett lukket og oppbevares på et kjølig sted, S3/7
pl: Przechowywać pojemnik szczelnie zamknięty w chłodnym miejscu, S3/7
pt: Conservar em recipiente bem fechado em lugar fresco, S3/7
sk: Uchovávajte nádobu tesne uzavretú na chladnom mieste, S3/7
sl: Hraniti v tesno zaprti posodi na hladnem, S3/7
sv: Förpackning förvaras väl tillsluten och svalt, S3/7

en: Keep in a cool place, S3
cs: Uchovávejte na chladném místě, S3
de: Kühl aufbewahren, S3
dk: Opbevares køligt, S3
el: Να φυλάσσεται σε δροσερό µέρος, S3
es: Consérvese en lugar fresco, S3
et: Hoida jahedas, S3
fi: Säilytettävä viileässä, S3
fr: Conserver dans un endroit frais, S3
hu: Hűvös helyen tartandó, S3
it: Conservare in luogo fresco, S3
lt: Laikyti vėsioje vietoje, S3
lv: Uzglabāt vēsā vietā, S3
mt: Żomm f'post frisk, S3
nl: Op een koele plaats bewaren, S3
no: Oppbevares kjølig, S3
pl: Przechowywać w chłodnym miejscu, S3
pt: Guardar em lugar fresco, S3
sk: Uchovávajte na chladnom mieste, S3
sl: Hraniti na hladnem, S3
sv: Förvaras svalt, S3

en: Keep in a cool\, well-ventilated place away from… (incompatible materials to be indicated by the manufacturer), S3/9/14
cs: Uchovávejte na chladném\, dobře větraném místě\, odděleně od… (vzájemně se vylučující látky uvede výrobce), S3/9/14
de: An einem kühlen\, gut gelüfteten Ort\, entfernt von… aufbewahren (die Stoffe\, mit denen Kontakt vermieden werden muss\, sind vom Hersteller anzugeben), S3/9/14
dk: Opbevares køligt\, godt ventileret og adskilt fra… (uforligelige stoffer angives af fabrikanten), S3/9/14
el: ∆ιατηρείται σε δροσερό και καλά αεριζόµενο µέρος µακριά από… (ασύµβατα υλικά που υποδεικνύονται από τον παραγωγό), S3/9/14
es: Consérvese en lugar fresco y bien ventilado y lejos de… (materiales incompatibles\, a especificar por el fabricante), S3/9/14
et: Hoida jahedas hästi ventileeritavas kohas  eraldi… (kokkusobimatud kemikaalid määrab valmistaja), S3/9/14
fi: Säilytettävä erillään… (yhteensopimattomat aineet ilmoittaa valmistaja/maahantuoja) viileässä paikassa\, jossa on hyvä ilmanvaihto, S3/9/14
fr: Conserver dans un endroit frais et bien ventilé à l'écart des… (matières incompatibles à indiquer par le fabricant), S3/9/14
hu: Hűvös\, jól szellőztetett helyen\, …-tól/-től távol tartandó (az összeférhetetlen anyag(oka)t a gyártó határozza meg), S3/9/14
it: Conservare in luogo fresco e ben ventilato lontano da… (materiali incompatibili da precisare da parte del fabbricante), S3/9/14
lt: Pakuotę laikyti vėsioje\, gerai vėdinamoje vietoje atokiau nuo… (nesuderinamas medžiagas nurodo gamintojas), S3/9/14
lv: Uzglabāt vēsā\, labi vēdināmā vietā\, bet ne kopā ar… (ražotājs norāda nesavietojamās vielas), S3/9/14
mt: Żomm f'post frisk u fvventilat tajjeb 'il bogħod minn… (materjali li ma jaqblux miegħu ikunu indikati mill-manifattur), S3/9/14
nl: Bewaren op een koele\, goed geventileerde plaats verwijderd van… (stoffen waarmee contact vermeden dient te worden\, aan te geven door de fabrikant), S3/9/14
no: Oppbevares på et kjølig\, godt ventilert sted adskilt fra… (angis av produsent eller importør), S3/9/14
pl: Przechowywać w chłodnym\, dobrze wentylowanym miejscu; z dala od… (materiału wskazanego przez producenta), S3/9/14
pt: Conservar em lugar fresco e bem ventilado ao abrigo de… (matérias incompatíveis a indicar pelo produtor), S3/9/14
sk: Uchovávajte na chladnom\, dobre vetranom mieste mimo dosahu… (inkompatibilný materiál bude určený výrobcom), S3/9/14
sl: Hraniti na hladnem\, dobro prezračevanem mestu\, ločeno od… (nezdružljive snovi določi proizvajalec), S3/9/14
sv: Förvaras svalt\, på väl ventilerad plats åtskilt från… (oförenliga ämnena anges av tillverkaren), S3/9/14

en: Keep only in the original container in a cool\, well-ventilated place away from… (incompatible materials to be indicated by the manufacturer), S3/9/14/49
cs: Uchovávejte pouze v původním obalu na chladném\, dobře větraném místě\, odděleně od… (vzájemně se vylučující látky uvede výrobce), S3/9/14/49
de: Nur im Originalbehälter an einem kühlen\, gut gelüfteten Ort\, entfernt von… aufbewahren (die Stoffe\, mit denen Kontakt vermieden werden muss\, sind vom Hersteller anzugeben), S3/9/14/49
dk: Må kun opbevares i originalemballagen på et køligt\, godt ventileret sted og adskilt fra… (uforligelige stoffer angives af fabrikanten), S3/9/14/49
el: ∆ιατηρείται µόνο µέσα στο αρχικό δοχείο σε δροσερό και καλά αεριζόµενο µέρος µακριά από… (ασύµβατα υλικά που υποδεικνύονται από τον παραγωγό), S3/9/14/49
es: Consérvese únicamente en el recipiente de origen\, en lugar fresco y bien ventilado y lejos de… (materiales incompatibles\, a especificar por el fabricante), S3/9/14/49
et: Hoida ainult originaalpakendis jahedas\, hästi ventileeritavas kohas eraldi (kokkusobimatud kemikaalid määrab valmistaja), S3/9/14/49
fi: Säilytettävä alkuperäispakkauksessa viileässä paikassa\, jossa on hyvä ilmanvaihto\, erillään… (yhteensopimattomat aineet ilmoittaa valmistaja/ maahantuoja), S3/9/14/49
fr: Conserver uniquement dans le récipient d'origine dans un endroit frais et bien ventilé à l'écart de… (matières incompatibles à indiquer par le fabricant), S3/9/14/49
hu: Hűvös\, jól szellőztetett helyen\, …-tól/-től távol\, csak az eredeti edényzetben tárolható (az összeférhetetlen anyag(oka)t a gyártó határozza meg), S3/9/14/49
it: Conservare soltanto nel contenitore originale in luogo fresco e ben ventilato lontano da… (materiali incompatibili da precisare da parte del fabbricante), S3/9/14/49
lt: Laikyti tik gamintojo pakuotėje\, vėsioje\, gerai vėdinamoje vietoje atokiau nuo… (nesuderinamas medžiagas nurodo gamintojas), S3/9/14/49
lv: Uzglabāt tikai originālajā iepakojumā vēsā\, labi vēdināmā vietā\, bet ne kopā ar… (ražotājs norāda nesavietojamās vielas), S3/9/14/49
mt: Żomm biss fil-kontenitur oriġinali f'post frisk u vventilat tajjeb 'il bogħod minn… (materjali li ma jaqblux miegħu jkunu indikati mill-manifattur), S3/9/14/49
nl: Uitsluitend in de oorspronkelijke verpakking bewaren op een koele\, goed geventileerde plaats verwijderd van… (stoffen waarmee contact vermeden dient te worden\, aan te geven door de fabrikant), S3/9/14/49
no: Må kun oppbevares i original emballasjen på et kjølig\, godt ventilert sted adskilt fra… (angis av produsent eller importør), S3/9/14/49
pl: Przechowywać wyłącznie w oryginalnym opakowaniu\, w chłodnym\, dobrze wentylowanym miejscu; nie przechowywać razem z… (materiałami wskazanymi przez producenta), S3/9/14/49
pt: Conservar unicamente no recipiente de origem\, em lugar fresco e bem ventilado ao abrigo de… (matérias incompatíveis a indicar pelo produtor), S3/9/14/49
sk: Uchovávajte len v pôvodnej nádobe na chladnom\, dobre vetranom mieste\, mimo dosahu… (inkompatibilný materiál bude určený výrobcom), S3/9/14/49
sl: Hraniti samo v izvirni posodi\, na hladnem\, dobro prezračevanem mestu\, ločeno od… (nezdružljive snovi določi proizvajalec), S3/9/14/49
sv: Förvaras i den ursprungliga förpackningen på sval väl ventilerad plats åtskilt från… (de oförenliga ämnena anges av tillverkare/importör), S3/9/14/49

en: Keep only in the original container in a cool well ventilated place away from acids, S3/9/14/49.1
de: Nur im Originalbehälter an einem kühlen\, gut gelüfteten Ort\, entfernt von Säuren aufbewahren, S3/9/14/49.1
dk: Må kun opbevares i originalemballagen på et køligt\, godt ventileret sted og adskilt fra syrer, S3/9/14/49.1
es: Consérvese únicamente en el recipiente de origen\, en lugar fresco y bien ventilado y lejos de ácidos, S3/9/14/49.1
fi: Säilytettävä alkuperäispakkanksessa viileässä paikassa\, jossa on hyvä ilmanvaihto\, erillään seuraavista aineista hapoista, S3/9/14/49.1
fr: Conserver uniquement dans le récipient d'origine dans un endroit fraisaet bien ventilé à l'écart des acides, S3/9/14/49.1
it: Conservare soltanto nel contenitore originale in luogo fresco e ben ventilato lontano da acidi, S3/9/14/49.1
nl: Uitsluitend in de oorspronkelijke verpakking bewaren op een koele\, goed geventileerde plaats verwijderd van zuren, S3/9/14/49.1
no: Må kun oppbevares i original emballasjen på et kjølig\, godt ventilert sted adskilt fra syrer, S3/9/14/49.1
pt: Conservar unicamente no recipiente de origem em lugar fresco e bem ventilado ao abrigo de ácidos, S3/9/14/49.1
sv: Förvaras i den ursprungliga förpackningen på sval väl ventilerad plats .åtskilt från syror, S3/9/14/49.1

en: Keep only in the original container in a cool well ventilated place away from alkali, S3/9/14/49.2
de: Nur im Originalbehälter an einem kühlen\, gut gelüfteten Ort\, entfernt von Laugen aufbewahren, S3/9/14/49.2
dk: Må kun opbevares i originalemballagen på et køligt\, godt ventileret sted og adskilt fra lud, S3/9/14/49.2
es: Consérvese únicamente en el recipiente de origen\, en lugar fresco y bien ventilado y lejos de lejías, S3/9/14/49.2
fi: Säilytettävä alkuperäispakkanksessa viileässä paikassa\, jossa on hyvä ilmanvaihto\, erillään seuraavista aineista emäksistä, S3/9/14/49.2
fr: Conserver uniquement dans le récipient d'origine dans un endroit fraisaet bien ventilé à l'écart des lessives alcalines, S3/9/14/49.2
it: Conservare soltanto nel contenitore originale in luogo fresco e ben ventilato lontano da alcali, S3/9/14/49.2
nl: Uitsluitend in de oorspronkelijke verpakking bewaren op een koele\, goed geventileerde plaats verwijderd van loog, S3/9/14/49.2
no: Må kun oppbevares i original emballasjen på et kjølig\, godt ventilert sted adskilt fra lut, S3/9/14/49.2
pt: Conservar unicamente no recipiente de origem em lugar fresco e bem ventilado ao abrigo de lixívias, S3/9/14/49.2
sv: Förvaras i den ursprungliga förpackningen på sval väl ventilerad plats .åtskilt från baser, S3/9/14/49.2

en: Keep only in the original container in a cool well ventilated place away from metals, S3/9/14/49.3
de: Nur im Originalbehälter an einem kühlen\, gut gelüfteten Ort\, entfernt von Metallen aufbewahren, S3/9/14/49.3
dk: Må kun opbevares i originalemballagen på et køligt\, godt ventileret sted og adskilt fra metaller, S3/9/14/49.3
es: Consérvese únicamente en el recipiente de origen\, en lugar fresco y bien ventilado y lejos de metales, S3/9/14/49.3
fi: Säilytettävä alkuperäispakkanksessa viileässä paikassa\, jossa on hyvä ilmanvaihto\, erillään seuraavista aineista metalleista, S3/9/14/49.3
fr: Conserver uniquement dans le récipient d'origine dans un endroit fraisaet bien ventilé à l'écart des métaux, S3/9/14/49.3
it: Conservare soltanto nel contenitore originale in luogo fresco e ben ventilato lontano da metalli, S3/9/14/49.3
nl: Uitsluitend in de oorspronkelijke verpakking bewaren op een koele\, goed geventileerde plaats verwijderd van metalen, S3/9/14/49.3
no: Må kun oppbevares i original emballasjen på et kjølig\, godt ventilert sted adskilt fra metaller, S3/9/14/49.3
pt: Conservar unicamente no recipiente de origem em lugar fresco e bem ventilado ao abrigo de metais, S3/9/14/49.3
sv: Förvaras i den ursprungliga förpackningen på sval väl ventilerad plats.åtskilt från metaller, S3/9/14/49.3

en: Keep only in the original container in a cool well ventilated place away from metal salts, S3/9/14/49.4
ar: يُحفظ فقط في الحاوية الأصلية في مكان بارد وجيد التهوية بعيدًا عن أملاح المعادن, S3/9/14/49.4
bg: Да се съхранява само в оригиналната опаковка на хладно и добре проветриво място, далеч от метални соли, S3/9/14/49.4
cs: Uchovávejte pouze v původním obalu na chladném, dobře větraném místě, odděleně od kovových solí, S3/9/14/49.4
da: Opbevares kun i originalemballagen på et køligt, godt ventileret sted adskilt fra metalsalte, S3/9/14/49.4
de: Nur im Originalbehälter an einem kühlen, gut gelüfteten Ort, entfernt von Metallsalzen aufbewahren, S3/9/14/49.4
el: Να φυλάσσεται μόνο στο αρχικό δοχείο σε δροσερό και καλά αεριζόμενο μέρος, μακριά από άλατα μετάλλων, S3/9/14/49.4
es: Consérvese únicamente en el recipiente de origen, en lugar fresco y bien ventilado y lejos de sales metálicas, S3/9/14/49.4
et: Hoida ainult originaalpakendis jahedas, hästi ventileeritavas kohas eraldi metallisooladest, S3/9/14/49.4
fi: Säilytettävä alkuperäispakkauksessa viileässä paikassa, jossa on hyvä ilmanvaihto, erillään metallisuoloista, S3/9/14/49.4
fr: Conserver uniquement dans le récipient d'origine dans un endroit frais et bien ventilé à l'écart des sels métalliques, S3/9/14/49.4
hr: Čuvati samo u originalnom spremniku na hladnom i dobro prozračenom mjestu, odvojeno od metalnih soli, S3/9/14/49.4
hu: Csak az eredeti edényben, hűvös, jól szellőző helyen, fémsóktól elkülönítve tárolandó, S3/9/14/49.4
it: Conservare soltanto nel contenitore originale in luogo fresco e ben ventilato lontano da sali metallici, S3/9/14/49.4
ja: 金属塩から離れた、涼しく換気の良い場所に、元の容器にのみ保管してください。, S3/9/14/49.4
ko: 금속 염과 떨어진 서늘하고 통풍이 잘 되는 곳에 원래 용기에만 보관하십시오, S3/9/14/49.4
lt: Laikyti tik originalioje talpykloje vėsioje, gerai vėdinamoje vietoje, atokiau nuo metalų druskų, S3/9/14/49.4
lv: Uzglabāt tikai oriģinālajā iepakojumā vēsā, labi vēdināmā vietā, atdalīti no metālu sāļiem, S3/9/14/49.4
mk: Да се чува само во оригиналниот сад на ладно и добро проветрено место, подалеку од метални соли, S3/9/14/49.4
mt: Żomm biss fil-kontenitur oriġinali f'post frisk u ventilat tajjeb 'il bogħod minn imlieħ tal-metall, S3/9/14/49.4
nl: Uitsluitend in de oorspronkelijke verpakking bewaren op een koele, goed geventileerde plaats verwijderd van metaalzouten, S3/9/14/49.4
no: Må kun oppbevares i original emballasjen på et kjølig, godt ventilert sted adskilt fra metallsalter, S3/9/14/49.4
pl: Przechowywać wyłącznie w oryginalnym opakowaniu w chłodnym, dobrze wentylowanym miejscu, z dala od soli metali, S3/9/14/49.4
pt: Conservar unicamente no recipiente de origem em lugar fresco e bem ventilado ao abrigo de sais metálicos, S3/9/14/49.4
ro: A se păstra numai în recipientul original într-un loc răcoros și bine ventilat, departe de sărurile metalice, S3/9/14/49.4
ru: Хранить только в оригинальной упаковке в прохладном, хорошо вентилируемом месте вдали от солей металлов, S3/9/14/49.4
sk: Uchovávajte len v pôvodnej nádobe na chladnom, dobre vetranom mieste, mimo dosahu kovových solí, S3/9/14/49.4
sl: Hraniti samo v originalni posodi na hladnem, dobro prezračevanem mestu, ločeno od kovinskih soli, S3/9/14/49.4
sq: Mbajeni vetëm në enën origjinale në një vend të freskët dhe të ajrosur mirë, larg kripërave metalike, S3/9/14/49.4
sv: Förvaras i den ursprungliga förpackningen på sval väl ventilerad plats.åtskilt från metallsalter, S3/9/14/49.4
tr: Sadece orijinal kabında, serin ve iyi havalandırılan bir yerde, metal tuzlarından uzakta saklayın, S3/9/14/49.4
uk: Зберігати тільки в оригінальній упаковці в прохолодному, добре вентильованому місці подалі від металевих солей, S3/9/14/49.4
zh: 仅在原始容器中于阴凉、通风处，远离金属盐储存。, S3/9/14/49.4

en: Store only in the original container in a cool well-ventilated place away from iron\, water and alkaline solution, S3/9/14/49.5
de: Nur im Originalbehälter an einem kühlen\, gut gelüfteten Ort\, entfernt von Eisen\, Wasser\, Lauge aufbewahren, S3/9/14/49.5
dk: Må kun opbevares i originalemballagen på et køligt\, godt ventileret sted og på afstand fra jern\, vand og lud, S3/9/14/49.5
es: Consérvese únicamente en el recipiente de origen\, en lugar fresco y bien ventilado y lejos de hierros\, aguas\, lejías, S3/9/14/49.5
fi: Säilytettävä alkuperäispakkauksessa viileässä paikassa\, jossa on hyvä ilmanvaihto\, erillään raudasta\, vedestä\, emäksistä, S3/9/14/49.5
fr: Conserver uniquement dans le récipient d'origine dans un endroit frais et bien aéré\, à l'écart des métaux\, de l'eau et des lessives alcalines, S3/9/14/49.5
it: Conservare soltanto nel contenitore originale in luogo fresco\, ben ventilato\, lontano da ferro\, acqua\, soluzioni alcaline, S3/9/14/49.5
nl: Uitsluitend in het originele reservoir op een koele\, goed geventileerde plaats\, ontdaan van ijzer\, water\, loog bewaren, S3/9/14/49.5
no: Må kun oppbevares i original emballasjen på et kjølig\, godt ventilert sted adskilt fra jern\, vann\, lut, S3/9/14/49.5
pt: Conservar unicamente no recipiente de origem em lugar fresco e bem ventilado ao abrigo de ferro\, água\, sabão, S3/9/14/49.5
sv: Förvaras i den ursprungliga förpackningen på sval väl ventilerad plats åtskilt från järn\, vatten\, baser, S3/9/14/49.5